Virginia statutes. Constitution of Virginia [1971]
Article XII. Future Changes.

§ 1. Amendments.

Any amendment or amendments to this Constitution may be proposed in the Senate or House of Delegates, and if the same shall be agreed to by a majority of the members elected to each of the two houses, such proposed amendment or amendments shall be entered on their journals, the name of each member and how he voted to be recorded, and referred to the General Assembly at its first regular session held after the next general election of members of the House of Delegates. If at such regular session or any subsequent special session of that General Assembly the proposed amendment or amendments shall be agreed to by a majority of all the members elected to each house, then it shall be the duty of the General Assembly to submit such proposed amendment or amendments to the voters qualified to vote in elections by the people, in such manner as it shall prescribe and not sooner than ninety days after final passage by the General Assembly. If a majority of those voting vote in favor of any amendment, it shall become part of the Constitution on the date prescribed by the General Assembly in submitting the amendment to the voters.

Cross references.

For statutory provisions as to how the Constitution is amended, see § 30-19.

Law Review.

For article on state constitutional law processes, see 24 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 169 (1983).

For annual survey of Virginia law, “Local Government Law,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 175 (2011).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Local Government Law,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 257 (2012).

For annual survey article, “Education Law,” see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 103 (2013).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see;
4C Constitutional Law, § 6.

§ 2. Constitutional convention.

The General Assembly may, by a vote of two thirds of the members elected to each house, call a convention to propose a general revision of, or specific amendments to, this Constitution, as the General Assembly in its call may stipulate.

The General Assembly shall provide by law for the election of delegates to such a convention, and shall also provide for the submission, in such manner as it shall prescribe and not sooner than ninety days after final adjournment of the convention, of the proposals of the convention to the voters qualified to vote in elections by the people. If a majority of those voting vote in favor of any proposal, it shall become effective on the date prescribed by the General Assembly in providing for the submission of the convention proposals to the voters.